Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-638] Evaluation of teachers and
educational officers. The department shall establish an evaluation program
for all teachers and educational officers. The evaluation shall be performed
at least once in each school year. The program shall define the criteria for
evaluation and assign responsibilities for the application of the criteria.
The evaluation of a teacher or educational officer shall be on the basis of
efficiency, ability, and such other criteria as the department shall determine.
[L 1996, c 89, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next